de: Regelung der Schallempfindlichkeit: Einstellbarer Drehregler; Einstellbar via App/Software; Einstellbar via Tasten; Einstellbar via Menü/Display; Automatische Verstärkung/Empfindlichkeit; Fest (nicht einstellbar); Andere
fi: Äänen herkkyyden säätö: Säädettävä nuppi/säädin; Säädettävissä sovelluksella/ohjelmistolla; Säädettävissä painikkeilla; Säädettävissä valikosta/näytöltä; Automaattinen vahvistus/herkkyys; Kiinteä (ei säädettävissä); Muu
en: Sound sensitivity control: Adjustable knob/dial; Adjustable via app/software; Adjustable via buttons; Adjustable via menu/display; Automatic gain/sensitivity; Fixed (not adjustable); Other
vi: Điều khiển độ nhạy âm thanh: Núm vặn/mặt số điều chỉnh được; Điều chỉnh qua ứng dụng/phần mềm; Điều chỉnh qua nút bấm; Điều chỉnh qua menu/màn hình; Độ nhạy/khuếch đại tự động; Cố định (không thể điều chỉnh); Khác
ru: Регулировка чувствительности к звуку: Регулировка поворотной ручкой; Регулировка через приложение/ПО; Регулировка кнопками; Регулировка через меню/дисплей; Автоматическое усиление/чувствительность; Фиксированная (без регулировки); Другое
pt-BR: Som controle de sensibilidade: Botão/seletor ajustável; Ajustável via app/software; Ajustável por botões; Ajustável pelo menu/tela; Ganho/sensibilidade automáticos; Fixo (não ajustável); Outro
ko: 소리 감도 조절: 조절식 노브/다이얼; 앱/소프트웨어를 통한 조절; 버튼을 통한 조절; 메뉴/디스플레이를 통한 조절; 자동 게인/감도; 고정형(조절 불가); 기타
lt-LT: Garso jautrumo valdymas: Reguliuojama rankenėle / ratuku; Reguliuojama per programėlę / programinę įrangą; Reguliuojama mygtukais; Reguliuojama per meniu / ekraną; Automatinis stiprinimas / jautrumas; Fiksuotas (nereguliuojamas); Kita
bg-BG: Контрол на чувствителността към звука: Регулируемо копче/врътка; Регулируемо през приложение/софтуер; Регулируемо чрез бутони; Регулируемо през меню/дисплей; Автоматично усилване/чувствителност; Фиксирано (нерегулируемо); Друго
sk-SK: Ovládanie citlivosti zvuku: Nastaviteľné pomocou gombíka/voliča; Nastaviteľné cez aplikáciu/softvér; Nastaviteľné pomocou tlačidiel; Nastaviteľné cez menu/displej; Automatické zosilnenie/citlivosť; Pevné (nenastaviteľné); Iné
ja: 音感度調整: 調整可能ノブ / ダイヤル; アプリ / ソフトウェア経由で調整可能; ボタン経由で調整可能; メニュー / ディスプレイ経由で調整可能; 自動ゲイン / 感度; 固定 (調整不可); その他
sl-SI: Nadzor občutljivosti zvoka: Prilagodljiv gumb/kolesce; Prilagodljivo prek aplikacije/programske opreme; Prilagodljivo z gumbi; Prilagodljivo prek menija/zaslona; Samodejno ojačenje/občutljivost; Fiksno (ni prilagodljivo); Drugo
th: การควบคุมความไวต่อเสียง: ปุ่มหมุนปรับ; ปรับผ่านแอป/ซอฟต์แวร์; ปรับผ่านปุ่ม; ปรับผ่านเมนู/จอแสดงผล; อัตราขยาย/ความไวเสียงอัตโนมัติ; คงที่ (ปรับไม่ได้); อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Controlo de sensibilidade de som: Botão/manípulo ajustável; Ajustável através de aplicação/software; Ajustável através de botões; Ajustável através de menu/ecrã; Ganho/sensibilidade automático; Fixo (não ajustável); Outro
tr: Ses hassasiyeti kontrolü: Ayarlanabilir düğme/kadran; Uygulama/yazılım üzerinden ayarlanabilir; Düğmelerle ayarlanabilir; Menü/ekran üzerinden ayarlanabilir; Otomatik kazanç/hassasiyet; Sabit (ayarlanamaz); Diğer
fr: Réglage de la sensibilité au son: Bouton/molette réglable; Réglable via application/logiciel; Réglable par boutons; Réglable via menu/écran; Gain/sensibilité automatique; Fixe (non réglable); Autre
pl: Kontrola czułości na dźwięk: Regulacja pokrętłem; Regulacja w aplikacji / oprogramowaniu; Regulacja przyciskami; Regulacja przez menu / wyświetlacz; Automatyczne wzmocnienie / czułość; Stała (brak regulacji); Inne
nb: Kontroll av lydfølsomhet: Justerbar knott/hjul; Justerbar via app/programvare; Justerbar via knapper; Justerbar via meny/skjerm; Automatisk forsterkning/følsomhet; Fast (ikke justerbar); Annet
cs: Ovládání citlivosti na zvuk: Nastavitelný knoflík/volič; Nastavitelné přes aplikaci/software; Nastavitelné pomocí tlačítek; Nastavitelné přes menu/displej; Automatické zesílení/citlivost; Pevné (nenastavitelné); Jiné
hu: Hangérzékenység szabályozása: Szabályozógombbal állítható; Alkalmazással/szoftverrel állítható; Gombokkal állítható; Menüből/kijelzőről állítható; Automatikus jelszint/érzékenység; Fix (nem állítható); Egyéb
ro-RO: Control al sensibilității la sunet: Buton/cadran ajustabil; Ajustabil prin aplicație/software; Ajustabil prin butoane; Ajustabil prin meniu/afișaj; Câștig/sensibilitate automată; Fix (neajustabil); Altele
nl: Geluidsgevoeligheid regeling: Verstelbare knop/draaiknop; Verstelbaar via app/software; Verstelbaar via knoppen; Verstelbaar via menu/display; Automatische gain/gevoeligheid; Vast (niet verstelbaar); Anders
zh-CN: 声音灵敏度控制: 可调节旋钮/刻度盘; 可通过应用/软件调节; 可通过按钮调节; 可通过菜单/显示屏调节; 自动增益/灵敏度; 固定（不可调节）; 其他
da: Justering af lydfølsomhed: Justerbar knap/drejeskive; Justerbar via app/software; Justerbar via knapper; Justerbar via menu/skærm; Automatisk forstærkning/følsomhed; Fast (ikke justerbar); Andet
es: Control de sensibilidad del sonido: Perilla o dial ajustable; Ajustable mediante aplicación o software; Ajustable mediante botones; Ajustable mediante menú o pantalla; Ganancia o sensibilidad automática; Fijo (no ajustable); Otro
zh-TW: 聲音靈敏度控制: 可調式旋鈕/轉盤; 透過應用程式/軟體調整; 透過按鈕調整; 透過選單/顯示器調整; 自動增益/靈敏度; 固定 (不可調整); 其他
it: Controllo della sensibilità del suono: Manopola/quadrante regolabile; Regolabile tramite app/software; Regolabile tramite pulsanti; Regolabile tramite menu/display; Guadagno/sensibilità automatici; Fisso (non regolabile); Altro
hr-HR: Kontrola osjetljivosti na zvuk: Prilagodljivi gumb/brojčanik; Prilagodljivo putem aplikacije/softvera; Prilagodljivo putem gumba; Prilagodljivo putem izbornika/zaslona; Automatsko pojačanje/osjetljivost; Fiksno (nije prilagodljivo); Ostalo
sv: Kontroll av ljudkänslighet: Justerbart vred/ratt; Justerbar via app/programvara; Justerbar via knappar; Justerbar via meny/skärm; Automatisk gain/känslighet; Fast (ej justerbar); Övrigt
el: Έλεγχος ευαισθησίας ήχου: Ρυθμιζόμενο περιστροφικό κουμπί/επιλογέας; Ρυθμιζόμενο μέσω εφαρμογής/λογισμικού; Ρυθμιζόμενο μέσω κουμπιών; Ρυθμιζόμενο μέσω μενού/οθόνης; Αυτόματο gain/ευαισθησία; Σταθερό (μη ρυθμιζόμενο); Άλλο